Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.433

Developmental disabilities endowment—Governing board—Liability of governing board and state investment board.

The developmental disabilities endowment governing board is established to design and administer the developmental disabilities endowment. To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the director of the department shall provide staff and administrative support to the governing board.

(1) The governing board shall consist of seven members as follows:

(a) Three of the members, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as finance, actuarial science, management, business, or public policy.

(b) Three members of the board, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as business, developmental disabilities service design, management, or public policy, and shall be family members of persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) The seventh member of the board, who shall serve as chair of the board, shall be appointed by the remaining six members of the board.

(2) Members of the board shall serve terms of four years and may be appointed for successive terms of four years at the discretion of the appointing authority. However, the governor may stagger the terms of the initial six members of the board so that approximately one-fourth of the members' terms expire each year.

(3) Members of the board shall be compensated for their service under RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4) The board shall meet periodically as specified by the call of the chair, or a majority of the board.

(5) Members of the governing board and the state investment board shall not be considered an insurer of the funds or assets of the endowment trust fund or the individual trust accounts. Neither of these two boards or their members shall be liable for the action or inaction of the other.

(6) Members of the governing board and the state investment board are not liable to the state, to the fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities as members, whether ministerial or discretionary, except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. The department and the state investment board, respectively, may purchase liability insurance for members.

[ 2012 c 197 s 1; 2010 c 271 s 201; 2009 c 565 s 11; 2000 c 120 s 5; 1999 c 384 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.70.733, 43.330.210.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2010 c 271: See notes following RCW 43.330.005.

Intent—Captions not law—1999 c 384: See notes following RCW 43.330.431.